Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202629-4901
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 29-4901 to 29-4908:

(1) Brady-Giglio case law means Brady v. Maryland, 373 U.S. 83 (1963), and Giglio v. United States, 405 U.S. 150 (1972), and subsequent cases of the Supreme Court of the United States and the Supreme Court of Nebraska;

(2) Brady-Giglio disclosure means a disclosure made by a prosecuting agency pursuant to Brady-Giglio case law;

(3) Law enforcement agency has the same meaning as in section 81-1401;

(4) Law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section 81-1401;

(5) Officer means:

(a) A law enforcement officer; or

(b) A correctional officer employed by a jail or by the Department of Correctional Services;

(6) Prosecuting agency means the Department of Justice, the office of a county attorney or city attorney, or a special prosecutor; and

(7) Public safety agency means:

(a) A law enforcement agency;

(b) A city or county jail;

(c) The Department of Correctional Services; or

(d) Any other agency of state or local government that employs officers.

Laws 2026, LB965, § 22.
October 1, 2026